Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.165

Loans to directors or officers.

No loans exceeding or more favorable than those which are customarily made to members or shareholders shall be made by a corporation to its directors or officers. The directors of a corporation who vote for or assent to the making of a loan in violation of this section to a director or officer of the corporation, and any officer or officers participating in the making of such loan, shall be jointly and severally liable to the corporation for the amount of such loan until the repayment thereof.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 33.]